Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to juvenile delinquents and domestic relations court, see art. 5, § 29, Wyo. Const.

As to notice of pendency of action between husband and wife, see §

1-6-108

.

As to privileged communications between husband and wife generally, see §

1-12-101

.

As to when husband and wife may testify against each other in civil and criminal cases, see §

1-12-104

.

As to adoption generally, see §§

1-22-101

through

1-22-117

.

For provisions abolishing action and prohibiting contracts or instruments based on actions relative to breach of contract to marry, alienation of affections, criminal conversation and seduction, see §

1-23-101

.

As to requirement that contracts in consideration of marriage be in writing, see §

1-23-105

.

As to children generally, see title 14.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1, revised this title, substituting §§

20-1-101

through 20-5-125 for §§ 20-1 through 20-167, W.S. 1957. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1977 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pre-emptive effect of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) provisions (29 USC Â§Â§b 1056(d)(3), 1144(a), 1144(b)(7)) with respect to orders entered in domestic relations proceedings, 116 ALR Fed 503.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice §§ 3.01, 3.02, 3.04 (Matthew Bender).